Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Subchapter 1. Supreme Court and Superior Court

§ 651.
Clerks of courts.

The Court Administrator shall act as clerk of the Supreme Court as provided in section 8 of this title. The Court Administrator shall appoint a Superior Court clerk for each unit. The Court Administrator may appoint the same person to be clerk in more than one unit. With approval of the Court Administrator, the clerk shall hire office staff. The clerk shall have the powers and responsibilities formerly held by the clerk of the district court or the family court and may delegate specific powers and responsibilities to assigned staff. Unless so designated by the assistant judges of a specific county, with the approval of the Court Administrator, a Superior Court clerk shall not also serve as a county clerk.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 174

, § 3;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.

§ 651a.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 652.
Repealed. 2013, No. 67, § 15.

§ 653.
Repealed.
1969, No. 27, § 2.

§ 654.
Repealed.
1977, No. 235 (Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§§ 655,
656.
Repealed. 2013, No. 67, § 15.

§ 657.
Transcribing damaged records.

When records in the Office of the Superior Court Clerk become faded, defaced, torn, or otherwise injured, so as to endanger the permanent legibility or proper preservation of the same, the Court Administrator may direct the court clerk to provide suitable books and transcribe such records into the books provided. At the end of a transcript of record so made, the clerk shall certify under official signature and the seal of the court that the same is a true transcript of the original record. Such transcript or a duly certified copy of the transcript shall be entitled to the same faith and credit and have the same force as the original record. The expense of making such transcript shall be paid by the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 174

, § 8;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 39;

2013, No. 67

, § 5;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 658.
Repealed. 2013, No. 67, § 15.

§ 659.
Preservation of court records.

The Supreme Court by administrative order may provide for permanent preservation of all court records by any photographic or electronic or comparable process in accordance with standards that shall be no less protective of the records than the standards established by the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration programs that take into account the quality and security of the records and ready access to the record of any cause so recorded.

After preservation in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the Supreme Court by administrative order may provide for the disposition of original court records by destruction or, in cases where the original court record may have historical or intrinsic value, by transfer to the archives of the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 241

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 7, 1976; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(2), eff. May 6, 1996;

2009, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 41;

2013, No. 67

, § 6.